New York, session 2025-2026, S8839.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 1676 of the 2 public authorities law is amended by adding a new undesignated paragraph 3 to read as follows: 4 The New York Climate Exchange Inc., to provide financing for 5 construction of facilities on Governor's Island. 6 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 1680 of the public authorities law is 7 amended by adding a new undesignated paragraph to read as follows: 8 The New York Climate Exchange Inc., to provide financing for 9 construction of facilities on Governor's Island. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14171-03-6